Utah statutes.
17-27a-507.   Exactions -- Exaction for water interest --Requirement to
offer to original owner property acquired by exaction.
(1)  A county may impose an exaction or exactions on development proposed in a
land use application, including, subject to Subsection (2), an exaction for a
water interest, if:
(a)  an essential link exists between a legitimate governmental interest and
each exaction; and
(b)  each exaction is roughly proportionate, both in nature and extent, to the
impact of the proposed development.
(2) (a) (i)  A county or, if applicable, the county's culinary water authority
shall base any exaction for a water interest on the culinary water authority's
established calculations of projected water interest requirements.
(ii)  Upon an applicant's request, the culinary water authority shall provide
the applicant with the basis for the culinary water authority's calculations
under Subsection (2)(a)(i) on which an exaction for a water interest is based.
(b)  A county or its culinary water authority may not impose an exaction for a
water interest if the culinary water authority's existing available water
interests exceed the water interests needed to meet the reasonable future
water requirement of the public, as determined under Subsection 73-1-4(2)(f).
(3) (a)  If a county plans to dispose of surplus real property under Section
17-50-312 that was acquired under this section and has been owned by the
county for less than 15 years, the county shall first offer to reconvey the
property, without receiving additional consideration, to the person who
granted the property to the county.
(b)  A person to whom a county offers to reconvey property under Subsection
(3)(a) has 90 days to accept or reject the county's offer.
(c)  If a person to whom a county offers to reconvey property declines the
offer, the county may offer the property for sale.
(d)  Subsection (3)(a) does not apply to the disposal of property acquired by
exaction by a community development or urban renewal agency.
